Maryland, session 2026, HB0416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0416*

HOUSE BILL 416
26–1601.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the number of licenses in a
class issued by the Board may not exceed:
(i) Class A beer, 4;
(ii) Class B beer, 23;
(iii) Class C beer, 3;
(iv) Class D beer, 33;
(v) Class A beer and light wine, 7;
(vi) Class B beer and light wine, 45;
(vii) Class B–GC beer and light wine, 4;
(viii) Class C beer and light wine, 8;
(ix) Class D beer and light wine, 99;
(x) Class A beer, wine, and liquor, 143;
(xi) [Class B beer, wine, and liquor, 215;
(xii)] Class B–AE beer, wine, and liquor, 15;
[(xiii)] (XII) Class BCE beer, wine, and liquor, 8;
[(xiv)] (XIII) Class B–CI beer, wine, and liquor, 2;
[(xv)] (XIV) Class B–DD beer, wine, and liquor:
1. under § 26–1614(a)(1) of this subtitle, 4;
2. under § 26–1614(a)(2) of this subtitle, 4;
3. under § 26–1614(a)(3) of this subtitle, 6;
4. under § 26–1614(a)(4) of this subtitle, 6;
5. under § 26–1614(a)(5) of this subtitle, 4;
6. under § 26–1614(a)(6) of this subtitle, 10;

HOUSE BILL 416 3
7. under § 26–1614(a)(7) of this subtitle, 3;
8. under § 26–1614(a)(8) of this subtitle, 5;
9. under § 26–1614(a)(9) of this subtitle, 2;
10. under § 26–1614(a)(10) of this subtitle, 1;
11. under § 26–1614(a)(11) of this subtitle, 1;
12. under § 26–1614(a)(12) of this subtitle, 1;
13. under § 26–1614(a)(13) of this subtitle, 1; and
14. under § 26–1614(a)(14) of this subtitle, 10;
[(xvi)] (XV) Class B/ECF beer, wine, and liquor, 1;
[(xvii)] (XVI) Class B–ECF/DS beer, wine, and liquor, 2;
[(xviii)] (XVII) Class B–ECR beer, wine, and liquor, 1;
[(xix)] (XVIII) Class B–Stadium (baseball stadium) beer, wine,
and liquor, 1;
[(xx)] (XIX) Class B–Stadium (football stadium) beer, wine, and liquor,
1;
[(xxi)] (XX) Class B–WPL (waterfront pavilion) beer, wine, and liquor,
3; and
[(xxii)] (XXI) Class C beer, wine, and liquor:
1. under § 26–1002 of this title, 1;
2. under § 26–1005 of this title, 12;
3. under § 26–1011 of this title, 25;
4. under § 26–1017 of this title, 30; and
5. under § 26–1019 of this title, 4.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.